District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.19a

Access to Registry information.

Unless otherwise authorized by District of Columbia or federal law, information in the Registry shall be accessible only to:

(1)

The organ procurement organization serving the District of Columbia; and

(2)

An agency licensed in or authorized by the laws of another state, when a District resident is a donor of an anatomical gift and is not located in the District of Columbia at the time of donor’s death or immediately before the time of death.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 20a, 55 DCR 2532